Utah statutes.
63L-1-202.   Governor to execute conveyances.

The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to execute all proper conveyances in the cession herein granted, upon request of the United States or the proper officers thereof, whenever any land shall have been acquired, leased, used, or reserved from the public domain for such purposes.

